Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.060

Record of proceedings.

The secretary shall keep an official record of all proceedings, a part of which record shall consist of a register of all applicants for licensure under this chapter, with the result of each application.

[ 1997 c 334 s 6; 1991 c 3 s 229; 1987 c 415 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.